Maryland, session 2026, HB1332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 5 – Calvert County
2–202.
(A) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS, OR A PERSON ACTING ON BEHALF OF
THE COMMISSIONERS, MAY NOT ENTER INTO A NONDISCLOSURE AGREEMENT OR A
CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT WITH ANOTHER PERSON.
(B) A PROVISION IN AN AGREEMENT THAT IS EXECUTED IN VIOLATION OF
THIS SECTION IS VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE AS CONTRARY TO PUBLIC POLICY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing
agreement, obligation, or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act and
that this Act shall be construed to apply only prospectively and may not be applied or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1332*

HOUSE BILL 1332
interpreted to have any effect on or application to any nondisclosure or confidentiality
agreement or provision in effect before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.